src/import/nouns.lexc
potikild+N:pot,i#k´ilD1%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
potilaat+N:pot,i#l´aat%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
potipõhi+N:pot,i#p´õhJ1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
potissepp+N:pot,is#s´epp%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
pots+N:p´ots%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@potsak+N:@P.Stem.Nom@potsak VIRSIK ;
@P.Stem.Nom@potsatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@potsatus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@potsik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pot,sik VIRSIK ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pott+N:@P.Stem.Nom@p´ot,t TAUD ;
pottsepp+N:p´ot,t#s´epp%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
pout+N:p´out TAUD ;
povidlo+N:pov`idlo PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@praad+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´aaD1 TAUD ;
praadimine+N:pr´aad,imine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@praak+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´aak TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@praak+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´aak%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@praaker+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´aaker REDEL ;
praalija+N:pr´aal,ija AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@praam+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´aam TAUD ;
praegusaeg+N:pr´aegus#´aE4G1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
praeguskultuur+N:pr´aegus#kult´uur TAUD ;
pragin+N:pragin MAGUS ;
pragmaatika+N:pragmaatika AASTA ;
pragmatism+N:pragmat´ism TAUD ;
pragu+N:praG1u%{stemill%} KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pragunevus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pragunevus SUULINE ;
prahmakas+N:prahmaka LOHAKAS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@praht+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´ahT1 TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@prahvak+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prahvak VIRSIK ;
prahvakas+N:prahvaka LOHAKAS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@prahvatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prahvatus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@praks+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´aks%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@praksak+N:@P.Stem.Nom@praksak VIRSIK ;
@P.Stem.Nom@praksatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@praksatus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@praksinoskoop+N:@P.Stem.Nom@praksino#sk´oop TAUD ;
praksis+N:praksis SOOLANE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@praktik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@praktik VIRSIK ;
praktika+N:praktika AASTA ;
praktikainimene+N:praktika#inimene OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@praktikant+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr`aktik´an,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@praktikum+N:@P.Stem.Nom@praktikum TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@praktilisus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@praktilisus OLULINE ;
praktitsism+N:praktits´ism TAUD ;
pralinee+N:pralin´ee%>%{id%}%{rare%} ARMEE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@praller+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´aller REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@prantsatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prantsatus OLULINE ;
prantslane+N:pr´antslane SUULINE ;
prantslanna+N:pr´antslanna PERE ;
prantssai+N:pr´ants#s´ai%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@prantsusehaigus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´antsuse#h´aigus OLULINE ;
prantsusehull+N:pr´antsuse#h´ull%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@prantsusehullus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´antsuse#h´ullus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@prantsusehullustus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´antsuse#hullustus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@praost+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´aost TAUD ;
praostihärra+N:praosti#härra PERE ;
praostkond+N:pr´aostk´onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
@P.Stem.Nom@prass+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´as,s TAUD ;
prassimine+N:pr´as,simine OLULINE ;
pravdalane+N:pravdalane OLULINE ;
preambula+N:pre`ambula AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@predikaat+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr`edik´aat TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@predikatiiv+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr`edikat´iiv TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@prednisoloon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prednisol´oon TAUD ;
preemia+N:pr´eemia AASTA ;
preeria+N:pr´eeria AASTA ;
preeriahunt+N:pr´eeria#h´un,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@prees+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´ees, TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@preesens+N:@P.Stem.Nom@preesens REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@preester+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´eestE2r REDEL ;
preesterkond+N:pr´eesterk´onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
preestrinna+N:pr´eestrinna PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@preestritar+N:@P.Stem.Nom@preestritar TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@preetor+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´eetor REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@prefekt+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pref´ekt TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@prefektuur+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prefekt´uur TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@preferanss+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr`efer´anss TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@prefiks+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prefiks REDEL ;
preili+N:preili PERE ;
preilna+N:preilna PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@preiskurant+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr`eiskur´an,t TAUD ;
preislane+N:pr´eislane SUULINE ;
preislanna+N:preislanna PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@prelaat+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prel´aat TAUD ;
preluudium+N:prel´uudium MUUSEUM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@prelüüd+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prel´üüd TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@preparaat+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr`epar´aat TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@preparaator+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prepar´aator REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@prepositsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prepositsi´oon TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@preprint+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prepr´int TAUD ;
prerafaeliit+N:pre#rafael´iit TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@presbüter+N:@P.Stem.Nom@presbüter TAUD ;
presbüterlane+N:presbüterlane OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@present+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pres´en,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@presentatsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@presentatsi´oon TAUD ;
presentjope+N:pres´en,t#jope PERE ;
presentpüksid+N:pres´en,t#p´üks POISS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@preserv+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pres´erv TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@preservatiiv+N:@P.Stem.Nom@preservat´iiv TAUD ;
presidendikandidaat+N:pr`esiden,di#k`an,did´aat TAUD ;
presidendipalee+N:pr`esiden,di#pal´ee%>%{id%}%{rare%} ARMEE ;
presidenditool+N:pr`esiden,di#t´ool, TAUD ;
presidendivalimised+N:pr`esiden,di#valimine OLULINE ;
presidendivoor+N:pr`esiden,di#v´oor%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@president+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr`esid´en,t TAUD ;
presiidium+N:pres´iidium MUUSEUM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@prespan+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´espan REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@press+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´es,s TAUD ;
pressibüroo+N:pres,si#bür´oo ARMEE ;
pressiesindaja+N:pres,si#esindaja AASTA ;
pressiklubi+N:pres,si#klubi%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA ;
pressikonverents+N:pres,si#k`onver´ents TAUD ;
pressimine+N:pr´es,simine OLULINE ;
pressinõunik+N:pres,si#n´õun´ik ÄMBLIK ;
pressiosakond+N:pres,si#`osak´onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
pressisekretär+N:pres,si#sekretär TAUD ;
pressisõber+N:pres,si#s´õP2E2r%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pressitalitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pres,si#talitus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pressiteenistus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pres,si#teenistus OLULINE ;
pressivaenlane+N:pres,si#v´aenlane SUULINE ;
pressraud+N:pr´es,s#r´auD1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@prestiiž+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prest´iiž TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@presumptsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@presumptsi´oon TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@preteeritum+N:@P.Stem.Nom@preteeritum TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pretendent+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr`etend´en,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pretensioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pretensi´oon TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pretensioonikus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pretensioonikus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pretoriaan+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pretori´aan TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pretsedenditus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pretsedenditus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pretsedent+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr`etsed´en,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pretsessioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pretsessi´oon TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pretsisioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pretsisi´oon TAUD ;
prevaleerimine+N:preval´eerimine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@preventsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@preventsi´oon TAUD ;
prigin+N:prigin MAGUS ;
priikslaskmine+N:pr´iiks#l´askmine SUULINE ;
priileivasööja+N:pr´ii#leiva#s´ööja AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@priim+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´iim TAUD ;
priimas+N:priimas SOOLANE ;
priimula+N:priimula AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@priimus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@priimus SOOLANE ;
priinimi+N:pr´ii#nim NIMI ;
priipõlv+N:pr´ii#p´õl, PÕLV ;
@P.Stem.Nom@priis+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´iis TAUD ;
priiskaja+N:pr´iiskaja AASTA ;
priiskamine+N:pr´iiskamine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@priius+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´iius SUULINE ;
priiusetooja+N:pr´iiuse#t´ooja AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@prikaas+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prik´aas TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@prikk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´ikk TAUD ;
prill-laud+N:pr´il,l-l´auD1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
prillauk+N:pr´il,l#´auk%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@prillid+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´il,l TAUD ;
prilliklaas+N:pril,li#kl´aas, TAUD ;
prillmadu+N:pr´il,l#maD1u KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@primaat+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prim´aat TAUD ;
primadonna+N:primad`onna PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@primitiiv+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr`imit´iiv TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@primitiivsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr`imit´iivsus SUULINE ;
primitivism+N:primitiv´ism TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pringel+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´ingE2l REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@prinkus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´inkus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@print+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´int TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@printer+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´inter REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@prints+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´ints TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@printsess+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr`ints´es,s TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@printsiibitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@printsiibitus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@printsiip+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prints´iip TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@printsipaal+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr`intsip´aal TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@printsipiaalsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@printsipi´aalsus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@prior+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prior REDEL ;
